Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
71-466
Religious residential facility; exemption
from licensure and regulation.

Any facility which is used as a residence by members of
an organization, association, order, or society organized and operated for
religious purposes, which is not operated for financial gain or profit for
the organization, association, order, or society, and which serves as a residence
only for such members who in the exercise of their duties in the organization,
association, order, or society are required to participate in congregant living
within such a facility is exempt from the provisions of the Health Care Facility
Licensure Act relating to licensure or regulation of assisted-living facilities,
intermediate care facilities, and nursing facilities.

Laws 2011, LB34, § 2.